Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3021
Appeal.

Any decision of the department or director in approving, conditionally approving, or denying a charter for a digital asset depository is appealable in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 21;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 35.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.